Vermont, session 2025-2026, H94.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 4412(11) is amended to read:
(11) Accessory on-farm businesses. No bylaw shall have the effect of
prohibiting an accessory on-farm business at the same location as a farm.
(A) Definitions. As used in this subdivision (11):
VT LEG #379497 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.94
2025 Page 2 of 3
(i) “Accessory on-farm business” means activity on a farm, the
revenues of which may exceed the revenues of the farming operation, and
comprises one or both of the following:
(I) The storage, preparation, processing, and sale of qualifying
products, provided that the qualifying products are produced on a farm; the
sale of products that name, describe, or promote the farm or accessory on-farm
business, including merchandise or apparel that features the farm or accessory
on-farm business; or the sale of bread or baked goods.
(II) Educational, recreational, or social events that feature
agricultural practices or qualifying products, or both. Such events may include
tours of the farm, farm stays, tastings and, meals, weddings, and concerts
featuring qualifying products, and classes or exhibits in the preparation,
processing, or harvesting of qualifying products. As used in this subdivision
(II), “farm stay” means a paid, overnight guest accommodation on a farm for
the purpose of participating in educational, recreational, or social activities on
the farm that feature agricultural practices or qualifying products, or both. A
farm stay includes the option for guests to participate in such activities.
* * *
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 6081(t) is amended to read:
(t) No permit or permit amendment is required for the construction of
improvements for an accessory on-farm business for the storage or sale of
VT LEG #379497 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.94
2025 Page 3 of 3
qualifying products or the other eligible enumerated products as defined in
24 V.S.A. § 4412(11)(A)(i)(I). No permit or permit amendment is required for
the construction of improvements for an accessory on-farm business for the
preparation or processing of qualifying products as defined in 24 V.S.A.
§ 4412(11)(A)(i)(I), provided that more than 50 percent of the total annual
sales of the prepared or processed qualifying products come from products
produced on the farm where the business is located. This subsection shall not
apply to No permit or permit amendment is required for the construction of
improvements related to hosting events or farm stays as part of an accessory
on-farm business as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 4412(11)(A)(i)(II) if the farm is
located in a municipality that has adopted performance standards and site plan
review.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379497 v.1